Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1461.01
Ballot question committee; surety bond; requirements; violations; penalty.

(1) A ballot question committee shall file with the commission a surety bond running in favor of the State of Nebraska with surety by a corporate bonding company authorized to do business in this state and conditioned upon the payment of all fees, penalties, and interest which may be imposed under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

(2) A bond in the amount of five thousand dollars shall be filed with the commission within thirty days after the committee receives contributions or makes expenditures in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in a calendar year, and the amount of the bond shall be increased by five thousand dollars for each additional five hundred thousand dollars received or expended in a calendar year.

(3) Proof of any required increase in the amount of the bond shall be filed with the commission within thirty days after each additional five hundred thousand dollars is received or expended. Any failure to pay late filing fees, civil penalties, or interest due under the act shall be recovered from the proceeds of the bond prior to recovery from the treasurer of the committee.

(4) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 16.